tests/numerals/numerals.yaml
Config:
  hfst: 
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../../tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../../tat.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "numbers in nom":
    1<num><subst><nom> : "1"
    2<num><subst><nom> : "2"
    3<num><subst><nom> : "3"
    4<num><subst><nom> : "4"
    5<num><subst><nom> : "5"
    6<num><subst><nom> : "6"
    7<num><subst><nom> : "7"
    8<num><subst><nom> : "8"
    9<num><subst><nom> : "9"
    10<num><subst><nom> : "10"
    11<num><subst><nom> : "11"
    12<num><subst><nom> : "12"
    13<num><subst><nom> : "13"
    14<num><subst><nom> : "14"
    15<num><subst><nom> : "15"
    16<num><subst><nom> : "16"
    17<num><subst><nom> : "17"
    18<num><subst><nom> : "18"
    19<num><subst><nom> : "19"
    20<num><subst><nom> : "20"
    21<num><subst><nom> : "21"
    22<num><subst><nom> : "22"
    23<num><subst><nom> : "23"
    24<num><subst><nom> : "24"
    25<num><subst><nom> : "25"
    26<num><subst><nom> : "26"
    27<num><subst><nom> : "27"
    28<num><subst><nom> : "28"
    29<num><subst><nom> : "29"
    30<num><subst><nom> : "30"
    31<num><subst><nom> : "31"
    32<num><subst><nom> : "32"
    33<num><subst><nom> : "33"
    34<num><subst><nom> : "34"
    35<num><subst><nom> : "35"
    36<num><subst><nom> : "36"
    37<num><subst><nom> : "37"
    38<num><subst><nom> : "38"
    39<num><subst><nom> : "39"
    40<num><subst><nom> : "40"
    41<num><subst><nom> : "41"
    42<num><subst><nom> : "42"
    43<num><subst><nom> : "43"
    44<num><subst><nom> : "44"
    45<num><subst><nom> : "45"
    46<num><subst><nom> : "46"
    47<num><subst><nom> : "47"
    48<num><subst><nom> : "48"
    49<num><subst><nom> : "49"
    50<num><subst><nom> : "50"
    51<num><subst><nom> : "51"
    52<num><subst><nom> : "52"
    53<num><subst><nom> : "53"
    54<num><subst><nom> : "54"
    55<num><subst><nom> : "55"
    56<num><subst><nom> : "56"
    57<num><subst><nom> : "57"
    58<num><subst><nom> : "58"
    59<num><subst><nom> : "59"
    60<num><subst><nom> : "60"
    61<num><subst><nom> : "61"
    62<num><subst><nom> : "62"
    63<num><subst><nom> : "63"
    64<num><subst><nom> : "64"
    65<num><subst><nom> : "65"
    66<num><subst><nom> : "66"
    67<num><subst><nom> : "67"
    68<num><subst><nom> : "68"
    69<num><subst><nom> : "69"
    70<num><subst><nom> : "70"
    71<num><subst><nom> : "71"
    72<num><subst><nom> : "72"
    73<num><subst><nom> : "73"
    74<num><subst><nom> : "74"
    75<num><subst><nom> : "75"
    76<num><subst><nom> : "76"
    77<num><subst><nom> : "77"
    78<num><subst><nom> : "78"
    79<num><subst><nom> : "79"
    80<num><subst><nom> : "80"
    81<num><subst><nom> : "81"
    82<num><subst><nom> : "82"
    83<num><subst><nom> : "83"
    84<num><subst><nom> : "84"
    85<num><subst><nom> : "85"
    86<num><subst><nom> : "86"
    87<num><subst><nom> : "87"
    88<num><subst><nom> : "88"
    89<num><subst><nom> : "89"
    90<num><subst><nom> : "90"
    91<num><subst><nom> : "91"
    92<num><subst><nom> : "92"
    93<num><subst><nom> : "93"
    94<num><subst><nom> : "94"
    95<num><subst><nom> : "95"
    96<num><subst><nom> : "96"
    97<num><subst><nom> : "97"
    98<num><subst><nom> : "98"
    99<num><subst><nom> : "99"
    100<num><subst><nom> : "100"
    1<num> : "1"
    2<num> : "2"
    3<num> : "3"
    4<num> : "4"
    5<num> : "5"
    6<num> : "6"
    7<num> : "7"
    8<num> : "8"
    9<num> : "9"
    10<num> : "10"
    11<num> : "11"
    12<num> : "12"
    13<num> : "13"
    14<num> : "14"
    15<num> : "15"
    16<num> : "16"
    17<num> : "17"
    18<num> : "18"
    19<num> : "19"
    20<num> : "20"
    21<num> : "21"
    22<num> : "22"
    23<num> : "23"
    24<num> : "24"
    25<num> : "25"
    26<num> : "26"
    27<num> : "27"
    28<num> : "28"
    29<num> : "29"
    30<num> : "30"
    31<num> : "31"
    32<num> : "32"
    33<num> : "33"
    34<num> : "34"
    35<num> : "35"
    36<num> : "36"
    37<num> : "37"
    38<num> : "38"
    39<num> : "39"
    40<num> : "40"
    41<num> : "41"
    42<num> : "42"
    43<num> : "43"
    44<num> : "44"
    45<num> : "45"
    46<num> : "46"
    47<num> : "47"
    48<num> : "48"
    49<num> : "49"
    50<num> : "50"
    51<num> : "51"
    52<num> : "52"
    53<num> : "53"
    54<num> : "54"
    55<num> : "55"
    56<num> : "56"
    57<num> : "57"
    58<num> : "58"
    59<num> : "59"
    60<num> : "60"
    61<num> : "61"
    62<num> : "62"
    63<num> : "63"
    64<num> : "64"
    65<num> : "65"
    66<num> : "66"
    67<num> : "67"
    68<num> : "68"
    69<num> : "69"
    70<num> : "70"
    71<num> : "71"
    72<num> : "72"
    73<num> : "73"
    74<num> : "74"
    75<num> : "75"
    76<num> : "76"
    77<num> : "77"
    78<num> : "78"
    79<num> : "79"
    80<num> : "80"
    81<num> : "81"
    82<num> : "82"
    83<num> : "83"
    84<num> : "84"
    85<num> : "85"
    86<num> : "86"
    87<num> : "87"
    88<num> : "88"
    89<num> : "89"
    90<num> : "90"
    91<num> : "91"
    92<num> : "92"
    93<num> : "93"
    94<num> : "94"
    95<num> : "95"
    96<num> : "96"
    97<num> : "97"
    98<num> : "98"
    99<num> : "99"
    100<num> : "100"

  "numbers in acc":
    1<num><subst><acc> : "1-не"
    2<num><subst><acc> : "2-ні"
    3<num><subst><acc> : "3-не"
    4<num><subst><acc> : "4-не"
    5<num><subst><acc> : "5-не"
    6<num><subst><acc> : "6-ны"
    7<num><subst><acc> : "7-ні"
    8<num><subst><acc> : "8-не"
    9<num><subst><acc> : "9-ны"
    10<num><subst><acc> : "10-ны"
    11<num><subst><acc> : "11-не"
    12<num><subst><acc> : "12-ні"
    13<num><subst><acc> : "13-не"
    14<num><subst><acc> : "14-не"
    15<num><subst><acc> : "15-не"
    16<num><subst><acc> : "16-ны"
    17<num><subst><acc> : "17-ні"
    18<num><subst><acc> : "18-не"
    19<num><subst><acc> : "19-ны"
    20<num><subst><acc> : "20-ны"
    21<num><subst><acc> : "21-не"
    22<num><subst><acc> : "22-ні"
    23<num><subst><acc> : "23-не"
    24<num><subst><acc> : "24-не"
    25<num><subst><acc> : "25-не"
    26<num><subst><acc> : "26-ны"
    27<num><subst><acc> : "27-ні"
    28<num><subst><acc> : "28-не"
    29<num><subst><acc> : "29-ны"
    30<num><subst><acc> : "30-ны"
    31<num><subst><acc> : "31-не"
    32<num><subst><acc> : "32-ні"
    33<num><subst><acc> : "33-не"
    34<num><subst><acc> : "34-не"
    35<num><subst><acc> : "35-не"
    36<num><subst><acc> : "36-ны"
    37<num><subst><acc> : "37-ні"
    38<num><subst><acc> : "38-не"
    39<num><subst><acc> : "39-ны"
    40<num><subst><acc> : "40-ны"
    41<num><subst><acc> : "41-не"
    42<num><subst><acc> : "42-ні"
    43<num><subst><acc> : "43-не"
    44<num><subst><acc> : "44-не"
    45<num><subst><acc> : "45-не"
    46<num><subst><acc> : "46-ны"
    47<num><subst><acc> : "47-ні"
    48<num><subst><acc> : "48-не"
    49<num><subst><acc> : "49-ны"
    50<num><subst><acc> : "50-не"
    51<num><subst><acc> : "51-не"
    52<num><subst><acc> : "52-ні"
    53<num><subst><acc> : "53-не"
    54<num><subst><acc> : "54-не"
    55<num><subst><acc> : "55-не"
    56<num><subst><acc> : "56-ны"
    57<num><subst><acc> : "57-ні"
    58<num><subst><acc> : "58-не"
    59<num><subst><acc> : "59-ны"
    60<num><subst><acc> : "60-ны"
    61<num><subst><acc> : "61-не"
    62<num><subst><acc> : "62-ні"
    63<num><subst><acc> : "63-не"
    64<num><subst><acc> : "64-не"
    65<num><subst><acc> : "65-не"
    66<num><subst><acc> : "66-ны"
    67<num><subst><acc> : "67-ні"
    68<num><subst><acc> : "68-не"
    69<num><subst><acc> : "69-ны"
    70<num><subst><acc> : "70-не"
    71<num><subst><acc> : "71-не"
    72<num><subst><acc> : "72-ні"
    73<num><subst><acc> : "73-не"
    74<num><subst><acc> : "74-не"
    75<num><subst><acc> : "75-не"
    76<num><subst><acc> : "76-ны"
    77<num><subst><acc> : "77-ні"
    78<num><subst><acc> : "78-не"
    79<num><subst><acc> : "79-ны"
    80<num><subst><acc> : "80-не"
    81<num><subst><acc> : "81-не"
    82<num><subst><acc> : "82-ні"
    83<num><subst><acc> : "83-не"
    84<num><subst><acc> : "84-не"
    85<num><subst><acc> : "85-не"
    86<num><subst><acc> : "86-ны"
    87<num><subst><acc> : "87-ні"
    88<num><subst><acc> : "88-не"
    89<num><subst><acc> : "89-ны"
    90<num><subst><acc> : "90-ны"
    91<num><subst><acc> : "91-не"
    92<num><subst><acc> : "92-ні"
    93<num><subst><acc> : "93-не"
    94<num><subst><acc> : "94-не"
    95<num><subst><acc> : "95-не"
    96<num><subst><acc> : "96-ны"
    97<num><subst><acc> : "97-ні"
    98<num><subst><acc> : "98-не"
    99<num><subst><acc> : "99-ны"
    100<num><subst><acc> : "100-не"
